Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202586-1611
Rules and regulations; proceedings.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and conduct any proceedings necessary to administer and enforce the Telecommunications Exchange Deregulation Act, including rules and regulations to determine whether an exchange should remain regulated, be deregulated, or be reregulated.

Laws 2025, LB311, § 11.